Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-908
Motion, defined.

A motion is an application for an order addressed to the court or a judge in vacation, by any party to a suit or proceeding, or one interested therein.

R.S.1867, Code § 572, p. 495;

R.S.1913, § 7724;

C.S.1922, § 8668;

C.S.1929, § 20-908;

R.S.1943, § 25-908.

Application or motion to set aside order vacating decree of divorce, and to reinstate decree, was after the term and required notice. Carmony v. Carmony, 112 Neb. 651, 200 N.W. 830 (1924).

Application for deficiency judgment may be made by motion. Crary v. Buck, 1 Neb. Unof. 596, 95 N.W. 839 (1901).